Illinois, session 104th, HB1924.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Metropolitan Transit Authority Act is 5amended by adding Section 54 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 3605/54 new)7    Sec. 54. Transportation for youth programs and services. 8The Authority shall, subject to appropriation, no later than 9July 1, 2026, establish a program that allows persons 18 or 10younger who enrolled as a student in a participating 11institution to use the Authority's buses and trains for 12transportation to youth programs or youth services without 13charge. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.